Nebraska, session 109, LB1134.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1134 LB1134
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 71-6403, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-6403 (1) There is hereby created the state building code. The
Legislature hereby adopts by reference:
(a) The International Building Code (IBC), 2018 edition, except
section 101.4.3 and chapter 29, published by the International Code
Council, except that (i) section 305.2.3 applies to a facility having
twelve or fewer children and (ii) section 310.4.1 applies to a care
facility for twelve or fewer persons;
(b) The International Residential Code (IRC), 2009 2018 edition,
except section R313 and chapters 25 through 33, published by the
International Code Council;
(c) The International Existing Building Code, 2018 edition, except
section 809, published by the International Code Council; and
(d) The Uniform Plumbing Code, 2018 edition, designated by the
American National Standards Institute as an American National Standard.
(2) The codes adopted by reference in subsection (1) of this section
and the minimum standards for radon resistant new construction adopted
under section 76-3504 shall constitute the state building code except as
amended pursuant to the Building Construction Act or as otherwise
authorized by state law.
Sec. 2. Section 71-6406, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
71-6406 (1)(a) Any county, city, or village may enact, administer,
or enforce a local building or construction code if or as long as such
county, city, or village:
(i) Adopts the state building code; or
(ii) Adopts a building or construction code that conforms generally
with the state building code.
(b) If a county, city, or village does not adopt a code as
authorized under subdivision (a) of this subsection within two years
-2-

LB1134 LB1134
2026 2026
after an update to the state building code, the state building code shall
apply in the county, city, or village, except that such code shall not
apply to construction on a farm or for farm purposes.
(2) A local building or construction code shall be deemed to conform
generally with the state building code if it:
(a) Adopts a special or differing building standard by amending,
modifying, or deleting any portion of the state building code in order to
reduce unnecessary costs of construction, increase safety, durability, or
efficiency, establish best building or construction practices within the
county, city, or village, or address special local conditions within the
county, city, or village;
(b) Adopts any supplement, new edition, appendix, or component or
combination of components of the state building code;
(c) Adopts any of the following:
(i) Section 305 or 310 of the 2018 edition of the International
Building Code without the exceptions described in subdivision (1)(a) of
section 71-6403;
(ii) Section 101.4.3 or any portion of chapter 29 of the 2018
edition of the International Building Code;
(iii) Section R313 or any portion of chapters 25 through 33 of the
2009 2018 edition of the International Residential Code; or
(iv) Section 809 of the 2018 edition of the International Existing
Building Code;
(d) Adopts a plumbing code, an electrical code, a fire prevention
code, or any other standard code as authorized under section 14-419,
15-905, 18-132, or 23-172;
(e) Adopts a local energy code as authorized under section 81-1618;
or
(f) Adopts minimum standards for radon resistant new construction
which meet the minimum standards adopted under section 76-3504.
(3) A local building or construction code shall not be deemed to
-3-

LB1134 LB1134
2026 2026
conform generally with the state building code if it:
(a) Includes a prior edition of any component or combination of
components of the state building code; or
(b) Does not include minimum standards for radon resistant new
construction that meet the minimum standards adopted under section
76-3504.
(4) A county, city, or village shall notify the Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment if it amends or modifies its local building or
construction code in such a way as to delete any portion of (a) chapter
13 of the 2018 edition of the International Building Code or (b) chapter
11 of the 2009 2018 edition of the International Residential Code. The
notification shall be made within thirty days after the adoption of such
amendment or modification.
(5) A county, city, or village shall not adopt or enforce a local
building or construction code other than as provided by this section.
(6)(a) Subject to subdivision (b) of this subsection, a (6) A
county, city, or village which adopts or enforces a local building or
construction code under this section shall regularly update its code. For
purposes of this section, a code shall be deemed to be regularly updated
if the most recently enacted state building code or a code that conforms
generally with the state building code is adopted by the county, city, or
village within two years after an update to the state building code.
(b)(i) A county, city, or village that enacts, administers, or
enforces a local building or construction code, electrical code, or
energy code shall not adopt an update or change to such a code without
providing, in a method determined by the governing body of such county,
city, or village, independent third-party evidence verifying that the
update or change is necessary to protect the public from eminently
dangerous situations or otherwise required by state or federal law.
(ii) The independent third-party evidence shall be from a source (a)
that has no financial interest in the adoption or enforcement of the
-4-

LB1134 LB1134
2026 2026
proposed code update or change and (b) possesses expertise in public
safety or municipal codes.
(iii) Eminently dangerous situations means situations or safety
hazards that present an imminent and unreasonable risk of death or severe
personal injury.
(c) Until January 1, 2031, a county, city, or village shall not
adopt or enforce a local construction or building code that is more
stringent or a more updated version than the state building code adopted
pursuant to section 71-6403 or a local electrical code that is more
stringent or a more updated version than the National Electrical code
filed with the Secretary of State and adopted by the State Electrical
Board under subdivision (5) of section 81-2104.
(7) A county, city, or village may adopt amendments for the proper
administration and enforcement of its local building or construction code
including organization of enforcement, qualifications of staff members,
examination of plans, inspections, appeals, permits, and fees. Any
amendment adopted pursuant to this section shall be published separately
from the local building or construction code. Any local building or
construction code adopted under subdivision (1)(a) of this section or the
state building code if applicable under subdivision (1)(b) of this
section shall be the legally applicable code regardless of whether the
county, city, or village has provided for the administration or
enforcement of its local building or construction code under this
subsection.
(8) A county, city, or village which adopts one or more standard
codes as part of its local building or construction code under this
section shall keep at least one copy of each adopted code, or portion
thereof, for use and examination by the public in the office of the clerk
of the county, city, or village prior to the adoption of the code and as
long as such code is in effect.
(9) Notwithstanding the provisions of the Building Construction Act,
-5-

LB1134 LB1134
2026 2026
a public building of any political subdivision shall be built in
accordance with the applicable local building or construction code. Fees,
if any, for services which monitor a builder's application of codes shall
be negotiable between the political subdivisions involved, but such fees
shall not exceed the actual expenses incurred by the county, city, or
village doing the monitoring.
Sec. 3. Section 72-804, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
72-804 (1) Any new state building shall meet or exceed the
requirements of the 2009 2018 International Energy Conservation Code
published by the International Code Council.
(2) Any new lighting, heating, cooling, ventilating, or water
heating equipment or controls in a state-owned building and any new
building envelope components installed in a state-owned building shall
meet or exceed the requirements of the 2009 2018 International Energy
Conservation Code.
(3) The State Building Administrator of the Department of
Administrative Services, in consultation with the Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment, may specify:
(a) A more recent edition of the International Energy Conservation
Code;
(b) Additional energy efficiency or renewable energy requirements
for buildings; and
(c) Waivers of specific requirements which are demonstrated through
life-cycle cost analysis to not be in the state's best interest. The
agency receiving the funding shall be required to provide a life-cycle
cost analysis to the State Building Administrator.
Sec. 4. Section 72-805, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
72-805 Except as provided in section 58-712 for certain projects
funded by the Affordable Housing Trust Fund, the 2009 2018 International
-6-

LB1134 LB1134
2026 2026
Energy Conservation Code, published by the International Code Council,
applies to all new buildings constructed in whole or in part with state
funds after July 1, 2020. The Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment shall review building plans and specifications necessary to
determine whether a building will meet the requirements of this section,
except that the department shall not be required to review building plans
and specifications upon evidence that the building plans and
specifications have previously been reviewed by a county, city, or
village enforcing a local building or construction code adopted pursuant
to section 71-6406 if such local building or construction code includes
the requirements of the 2009 2018 International Energy Conservation Code.
The department shall provide a copy of any review to the agency receiving
funding. The agency receiving the funding shall verify that the building
as constructed meets or exceeds the code. The verification shall be
provided to the department. The Director of Water, Energy, and
Environment may, in consultation with the State Building Administrator of
the Department of Administrative Services, adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out this section.
Sec. 5. Section 81-1608, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1608 The Legislature finds that consumers have an expectation
that newly built houses or buildings they buy meet uniform energy
efficiency standards. Therefor, the Legislature finds that there is a
need to adopt the 2009 2018 International Energy Conservation Code,
published by the International Code Council, in order (1) to ensure that
a minimum energy efficiency standard is maintained throughout the state,
(2) to harmonize and clarify energy building code statutory references,
(3) to ensure compliance with the federal Energy Policy Act of 1992, (4)
to increase energy savings for all Nebraska consumers, especially low-
income Nebraskans, (5) to reduce the cost of state programs that provide
assistance to low-income Nebraskans, (6) to reduce the amount of money
-7-

LB1134 LB1134
2026 2026
expended to import energy, (7) to reduce the growth of energy
consumption, (8) to lessen the need for new power plants, and (9) to
provide training for local code officials and residential and commercial
builders who implement the 2018 International Energy Conservation Code.
Sec. 6. Section 81-1609, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-1609 As used in sections 81-1608 to 81-1626, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(1) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment;
(2) Contractor means the person or entity responsible for the
overall construction of any building or the installation of any component
which affects the energy efficiency of the building;
(3) Architect or engineer means any person licensed as an architect
or professional engineer under the Engineers and Architects Regulation
Act;
(4) Building means any new structure, renovated building, or
addition which is used or intended for supporting or sheltering any use
or occupancy, but not including any structure which has a consumption of
traditional energy sources for all purposes not exceeding the energy
equivalent of three and four-tenths British Thermal Units per hour or one
watt per square foot;
(5) Residential building means a building three stories or less that
is used primarily as one or more dwelling units;
(6) Renovation means alterations on an existing building which will
cost more than fifty percent of the replacement cost of such building at
the time work is commenced or which was not previously heated or cooled,
for which a heating or cooling system is now proposed, except that the
restoration of historical buildings shall not be included;
(7) Addition means an extension or increase in the height,
conditioned floor area, or conditioned volume of a building or structure;
-8-

LB1134 LB1134
2026 2026
(8) Floor area means the total area of the floor or floors of a
building, expressed in square feet, which is within the exterior faces of
the shell of the structure which is heated or cooled;
(9) Nebraska Energy Code means the 2009 2018 International Energy
Conservation Code published by the International Code Council;
(10) Traditional energy sources means electricity, petroleum-based
fuels, uranium, coal, and all nonrenewable forms of energy; and
(11) Equivalent or equivalent code means standards that meet or
exceed the requirements of the Nebraska Energy Code.
Sec. 7. Section 81-1611, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-1611 The Legislature hereby adopts the 2009 2018 International
Energy Conservation Code published by the International Code Council as
the Nebraska Energy Code. The Director of Water, Energy, and Environment
may adopt regulations specifying alternative standards for building
systems, techniques, equipment designs, or building materials that shall
be deemed equivalent to the Nebraska Energy Code. Regulations specifying
alternative standards may be deemed equivalent to the Nebraska Energy
Code and may be approved for general or limited use if the use of such
alternative standards would not result in energy consumption greater than
would result from the strict application of the Nebraska Energy Code.
Sec. 8. Section 81-1618, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1618 (1) Any county, city, or village may adopt and enforce a
local energy code. Such local energy code shall be deemed equivalent to
the Nebraska Energy Code if it does not result in energy consumption
greater than would result from the strict application of the Nebraska
Energy Code and is reasonably consistent with the intent of sections
81-1608 to 81-1626. Any building or portion thereof subject to the
jurisdiction of and inspected by such county, city, or village shall be
deemed to comply with sections 81-1608 to 81-1626 if it meets the
-9-

LB1134 LB1134
2026 2026
standards of such local energy code. Such county, city, or village may by
ordinance or resolution prescribe a schedule of fees sufficient to pay
the costs incurred pursuant to sections 81-1608 to 81-1626.
(2) Any county, city, or village which adopts and enforces a local
energy code may waive a specific requirement of the Nebraska Energy Code
when meeting such requirement is not economically justified. The local
code authority shall submit to the department its analysis for
determining that a specific requirement is not justified. The department
shall review such analysis and transmit its findings and conclusions to
the local code authority within a reasonable time. The local code
authority shall submit to the department its explanation as to how the
original code or any revised code addresses the issues raised by the
department. After a local code authority has submitted such explanation,
the authority may proceed to enforce its local energy code.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (1) and (2) of this section and until
January 1, 2031, a county, city, or village shall not adopt or enforce a
local energy code that is more stringent or a more updated version than
the Nebraska Energy Code adopted pursuant to section 81-1611.
Sec. 9. Section 81-2104, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2104 The board shall have power to:
(1) Elect its own officers;
(2) Engage and fix the compensation of such officers, inspectors,
and employees as may be required in the performance of its duties;
(3) Pay such other expenses as may be necessary in the performance
of its duties;
(4) Provide upon request such additional voluntary inspections and
reviews as it deems appropriate;
(5) Adopt, promulgate, and revise rules and regulations necessary to
enable it to carry into effect the State Electrical Act. In adopting and
promulgating such rules and regulations, the board shall be governed by
-10-

LB1134 LB1134
2026 2026
the minimum standards set forth in the National Electrical Code issued
and adopted by the National Fire Protection Association beginning in the
2008 2023 edition of the National Electrical Code, Publication Number
70-2008 70-2023, except that the minimum standards set forth in the 2017
edition of the National Electrical Code shall apply for sections
210.8(A), 210.8(A)(3), 210.8(A)(5), 230.67(A), and 230.85. The Each
edition of the National Electrical Code mentioned in this subdivision
shall be filed in the offices of the Secretary of State and the board
during the time the edition is in use under this subdivision and shall be
a public record. The board shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations establishing wiring standards that protect public safety and
health and property and that apply to all electrical wiring which is
installed subject to the State Electrical Act;
(6) Revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew any license or registration
granted pursuant to the State Electrical Act when the licensee or
registrant (a) violates any provision of the National Electrical Code as
adopted pursuant to subdivision (5) of this section, the act, or any rule
or regulation adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act, (b) fails or
refuses to pay any examination, registration, or license renewal fee
required by law, (c) is an electrical contractor or master electrician
and fails or refuses to provide and keep in force a public liability
insurance policy as required by the board, or (d) violates any political
subdivision's approved inspection ordinances;
(7) Order disconnection of power to any electrical installation that
is proximately dangerous to health and property;
(8) Order removal of electrical wiring and apparatus from premises
when such wiring and apparatus is proximately dangerous to health and
property;
(9) Investigate, for the purpose of identifying dangerous electrical
wiring or violations of the National Electrical Code as adopted pursuant
to subdivision (5) of this section, any death by electrocution that
-11-

LB1134 LB1134
2026 2026
occurs within the State of Nebraska;
(10) Refuse to renew any license granted pursuant to the act when
the licensee fails to submit evidence of completing the continuing
education requirements under section 81-2117.01;
(11) Provide for the amount and collection of fees for inspection
and other services;
(12) Adopt a seal, and the executive secretary shall have the care
and custody thereof; and
(13) Enforce the provisions of the National Electrical Code as
adopted pursuant to subdivision (5) of this section.
Sec. 10. Original sections 81-1608, 81-1618, and 81-2104, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, section 71-6403, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, and sections 71-6406, 72-804, 72-805,
81-1609, and 81-1611, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-12-